Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 2. Issuance of Certificates of Convenience and Rights Thereunder.

§ 5.1-94.
Required certificate of public convenience and necessity.

No common carrier by aircraft or restricted common carrier by aircraft (not herein exempted) shall engage in intrastate operation in the airspace of this Commonwealth without first having obtained from the Commission a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing such operation.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-147; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-95.
Application for certificate; notices, etc.

The Commission shall prescribe the form of the application for a certificate of convenience and necessity, and such reasonable requirements as to notices, publication, proof of service and information as may in its judgment be necessary.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-148; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-96.
Fees in connection with certificates.

Every air carrier, upon filing with the Commission an application for a certificate, shall deposit with the Commission as a filing fee the sum of $100, and for the transfer of such certificate the sum of $100, and for the issuance of a duplicate certificate the sum of $5; provided, however, that an applicant for a certificate in lieu of an existing certificate, as provided by law, shall not be required to pay the fees prescribed in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-149; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-97.
Hearing on application; action of Commission.

Upon the filing of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the Commission shall, within a reasonable time, fix a time and place of hearing on such application. If the Commission shall find that the proposed operation justified it, it shall issue a certificate to the applicant, subject to such terms, limitations and restrictions as the Commission may deem proper. If the Commission shall find the proposed operation not justified, the application shall be denied.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-150; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-98.
Factors to be considered by the Commission in granting certificates.

In granting certificates of public convenience and necessity pursuant to § 5.1-94, the Commission shall take into consideration, among other things, the business experience of the particular passenger air carrier in the field of air operations, the financial stability of the carrier, the insurance coverage of the carrier, the type of aircraft which the carrier would employ, proposed routes and minimum schedules to be established, whether the carrier could economically give adequate service to the communities involved, the need for the service, and any other factors which may affect the public interest.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-152; 1970, c. 708.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

§ 5.1-99.
Occasional deviations from authorized routes; emergency landings.

A common carrier by aircraft, or a restricted common carrier by aircraft, operating under a certificate issued by the Commission may occasionally deviate from the route over which it is authorized to operate under the certificate, under such general or special rules and regulations as the Commission may prescribe.

No air carrier shall be deemed to have violated any term, condition, or limitation of its certificate by landing or taking off during an emergency at a point not named in its certificate or by operating in an emergency, under regulations which may be prescribed by the Commission, between terminal and intermediate points other than those specified in its certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-153; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-100.
Transportation of baggage, mail, etc., with passengers.

A certificate for the transportation of passengers may include, when so authorized by the Commission, authority to transport, in the same aircraft with passengers, the baggage of such passengers, newspapers, express parcels, or United States mail when the transportation thereof is authorized by the government of the United States of America; provided that the total weight of the aircraft and its contents shall not exceed that weight authorized by the “Operations Record” of the individual aircraft.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-154; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-101.
Chartered parties covered by common carriers.

Any common carrier by aircraft transporting passengers under a certificate issued by the Commission may operate to any place special or chartered parties, under such reasonable rules and regulations as the Commission may prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-155; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-102.
Schedule changes require Commission approval.

A common carrier by aircraft or a restricted common carrier by aircraft operation under a certificate issued by the Commission shall not make any change in schedules or service without having first received the approval of the Commission for such change in schedules or service.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-156; 1970, c. 708.